Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-188] Approval by third persons.
The articles may require an amendment to the articles or bylaws to be approved
in writing by a specified person or persons other than the board. Such a
provision in the articles may only be amended with the approval in writing of
such person or persons. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next